Washington statutes.
RCW 36.04.080

Cowlitz county.

Cowlitz county shall consist of the territory bounded as follows, to wit: Commencing at the Columbia river opposite the mouth of Lewis river; thence up Lewis river to the forks of said river; thence up the north fork of Lewis river to where said north fork of Lewis river intersects the range line between ranges four and five east; thence north to the line between townships ten and eleven north; thence west to the first section line east of the range line between ranges four and five west; thence south on said line to the Columbia river, and up the Columbia river to the place of beginning.

[ 1873 p 561 s 1; 1871 p 153 s 1; 1869 p 295 s 1; 1867 p 48 s 1; 1855 p 39; 1854 p 471 s 1; RRS s 3932.]